src/morphology/hacks/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksiinseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yksissäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksiseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yksiäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yksiksiseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdettäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhdeötäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdelläseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhtelleseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0yhdestäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0yhtenäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0yhdenseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhteenseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdessäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yhtäseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiseitsemättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yhdeksiseitsemättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0yksittätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksiltätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yksillätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksilletoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0yksinetoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0yksistätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0yksinätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0yksientoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksiintoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yksissätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yksiätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yksiksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdettätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhdeötätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdellätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhtelletoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0yhdestätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0yhtenätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0yhdentoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhteentoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdessätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yhtätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksitoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yhdeksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0yksittäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksiltäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yksilläviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksilleviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0yksineviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0yksistäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0yksinäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0yksienviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksiinviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yksissäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksiviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yksiäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yksiksiviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdettäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhdeötäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdelläviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhtelleviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0yhdestäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0yhtenäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0yhdenviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhteenviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdessäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yhtäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiviidettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yhdeksiviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0yksittäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksiltäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yksilläyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksilleyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0yksineyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0yksistäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0yksinäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0yksienyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yksiinyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yksissäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksiyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yksiäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yksiksiyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdettäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhdeötäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdelläyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhtelleyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0yhdestäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0yhtenäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0yhdenyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0yhteenyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0yhdessäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0yksiyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0yhtäyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=yksiyhdeksättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0yhdeksiyhdeksättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
